Utah statutes.
63M-1-2703.   Definitions.
As used in this part, "business resource centers" means entities established
by the Governor's Office of Economic Development in partnership with state
public institutions of higher education as certified resource centers to
provide private businesses with one-stop technical assistance and access to
statewide resources and programs, and to identify, coordinate, track, and
measure the impact of business resource programs provided by state agencies in
the various regions of the state.
